Maryland, session 2025, SB0200.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – State Personnel and Pensions
32–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(f) “Supplemental Board” means the State Board of Trustees of the Maryland
[Teachers and] State Employees Supplemental Retirement Plans established under §
35–201 of this article.
35–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
– 1 –

Ch. 616 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(b) “Board” means the State Board of Trustees of the Maryland [Teachers and]
State Employees Supplemental Retirement Plans.
35–201.
There is a Board of Trustees of the Maryland [Teachers and] State Employees
Supplemental Retirement Plans.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, as provided in this Act:
(a) The Board of Trustees of the Maryland State Employees Supplemental
Retirement Plans is the successor of the Board of Trustees of the Maryland Teachers and
State Employees Supplemental Retirement Plans.
(b) In every law, executive order, rule, regulation, policy, or document created by
an official, an employee, or a unit of this State, the names and titles of those agencies and
officials mean the names and titles of the successor agency or official.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That nothing in this Act affects the
term of office of an appointed or elected member of any commission, office, department,
agency, or other unit. An individual who is a member of a unit on the effective date of this
Act shall remain for the balance of the term to which appointed or elected, unless the
member sooner dies, resigns, or is removed under provisions of law.
SECTION 4. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That any transaction or
employment status affected by or flowing from any change of nomenclature or any statute
amended by this Act and validly entered into or existing before the effective date of this Act
and every right, duty, or interest flowing from a statute amended by this Act remains valid
after the effective date of this Act and may be terminated, completed, consummated, or
enforced as required or allowed by any statute amended by this Act as though the
amendment had not occurred. If a change in nomenclature involves a change in name or
designation of any State unit, the successor unit shall be considered in all respects as
having the powers and obligations granted the former unit.
SECTION 5. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:
(1) the continuity of every commission, office, department, agency, or other
unit is retained; and
(2) the personnel, records, files, furniture, fixtures, and other properties
and all appropriations, credits, assets, liabilities, and obligations of each retained unit are
continued as the personnel, records, files, furniture, fixtures, properties, appropriations,
credits, assets, liabilities, and obligations of the unit under the laws enacted by this Act.
SECTION 6. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That letterhead, business cards,
and other documents reflecting the renaming of the Board of Trustees of the Maryland
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 616
Teachers and State Employees Supplemental Retirement Plans to be the Board of Trustees
of the Maryland State Employees Supplemental Retirement Plans may not be used until
all letterhead, business cards, and other documents already in print and reflecting the
name of the Board of Trustees of the Maryland Teachers and State Employees
Supplemental Retirement Plans before the effective date of this Act have been used.
SECTION 7. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the publisher of the
Annotated Code of Maryland, in consultation with and subject to the approval of the
Department of Legislative Services, shall correct, with no further action required by the
General Assembly, cross–references and terminology rendered incorrect by this Act. The
publisher shall adequately describe any correction made in an editor’s note following the
section affected.
SECTION 8. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 20, 2025.
– 3 –